Utah statutes.
73-10-28.   Charges for use -- Interest.

(1)  As used in this section, "board" means the Board of Water Resources created in Section 73-10-1.5.

(2)  The board shall establish:

(a)  a charge for the use of water, power, or a facility based on:

(i)  a contractual agreement approved by the board for a project owned by the state; and

(ii)  the ability of an individual project to return the investment to the state; and

(b)  an interest rate for the money the board lends to finance a project based on:

(i)  market conditions;

(ii)  the repayment ability of the project; and

(iii)  other factors considered relevant by the board.

